bg-BG: Тип дизайн на ключ за барабан: Сгъваем ключ; Ключ с механизъм за отпускане; Магнитен ключ; Мултифункционален ключ; С тресчотка; Бърз ключ (въртящ се); Стандартен (Г-образен); Т-образна дръжка; Крилчат ключ; Друго
de: Typ des Stimmschlüsseldesigns: Klappbarer Stimmschlüssel; Schlüssel mit Entstimmer; Magnetischer Stimmschlüssel; Multitool-Stimmschlüssel; Mit Ratsche; Speed Key (Kurbel); Standard (L-förmig); T-Griff; Flügelschlüssel; Sonstige
ru: Тип конструкции барабанного ключа: Складной ключ; Ключ с детюнером; Магнитный ключ; Ключ-мультитул; Трещоточный; Скоростной ключ (вертушка); Стандартный (Г-образный); С Т-образной ручкой; Барашковый ключ; Другое
el: Τύπος σχεδίασης κλειδιού τυμπάνου: Αναδιπλούμενο κλειδί; Κλειδί με αποκουρδιστή; Μαγνητικό κλειδί; Πολυεργαλείο κλειδί; Με καστάνια; Κλειδί ταχύτητας (spinner); Τυπικό (σχήματος L); Λαβή σχήματος Ταυ; Κλειδί-πεταλούδα; Άλλο
en: Drum key design type: Folding key; Key with detuner; Magnetic key; Multi-tool key; Ratcheting; Speed key (spinner); Standard (L-shape); T-handle; Wing key; Other
hu: Dobkulcs kialakítás típusa: Összecsukható kulcs; Kulcs hangoláslazítóval; Mágneses kulcs; Multiszerszám-kulcs; Racsnis; Gyorshangoló kulcs (forgó); Normál (L alakú); T-fogantyús; Szárnyas kulcs; Egyéb
th: ประเภทการออกแบบกุญแจตั้งกลอง: กุญแจแบบพับ; กุญแจพร้อมตัวคลาย; กุญแจแม่เหล็ก; กุญแจอเนกประสงค์; แบบมีเฟือง; กุญแจปรับความเร็ว (สปินเนอร์); มาตรฐาน (รูปตัว L); แฮนเดิลรูปตัว T; กุญแจปีกผีเสื้อ; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de conception de la clé de tambour: Clé pliante; Clé avec désaccordeur; Clé magnétique; Clé multifonction; À cliquet; Clé rapide (rotative); Standard (en L); Poignée en T; Clé papillon; Autre
fi: Rummun avaimen rakennetyyppi: Taittuva avain; Avain virityksen poistolla; Magneettinen avain; Monitoimiavain; Räikkä; Pika-avain (pyöritin); Vakio (L-muotoinen); T-kahva; Siipiavain; Muu
ko: 드럼 키 디자인 유형: 접이식 키; 디튜너 포함 키; 자석 키; 멀티툴 키; 라쳇식; 스피드 키 (스피너); 표준형 (L자형); T 핸들; 윙 키; 기타
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie kľúča na bubon: Skladací kľúč; Kľúč s rozlaďovačom; Magnetický kľúč; Multifunkčný kľúč; Račňový; Rýchlostný kľúč (rotačný); Štandardný (tvar L); T-rukoväť; Krídlový kľúč; Iné
zh-TW: 鼓鎖設計類型: 摺疊式鼓鎖; 附降音功能鼓鎖; 磁吸式鼓鎖; 多功能鼓鎖; 棘輪式; 快速鼓鎖 (旋轉式); 標準型 (L 型); T 型把手; 蝶形鼓鎖; 其他
ja: ドラムキーデザインタイプ: 折りたたみ式キー; デチューナー付きキー; マグネットキー; マルチツールキー; ラチェット式; スピードキー (スピナー); 標準 (L字型); Tハンドル; ウィングキー; その他
da: Designtype for stemmenøgle til tromme: Foldbar nøgle; Nøgle med detuner; Magnetisk nøgle; Multiværktøjsnøgle; Med skralde; Speed key (spinner); Standard (L-formet); T-håndtag; Vingenøgle; Anden
hr-HR: Dizajn ključa za bubanj: Sklopivi ključ; Ključ s otpuštačem; Magnetski ključ; Ključ kao višenamjenski alat; S čegrtaljkom; Ključ za brzo zatezanje (spinner); Standardni (L-oblik); T-ručka; Krilasti ključ; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de design da chave de tambor: Chave dobrável; Chave com afinador; Chave magnética; Chave multiferramenta; Com catraca; Chave rápida (spinner); Padrão (formato L); Cabo em T; Chave borboleta; Outra
pl: Typ konstrukcji kluczy do strojenia perkusji: Składany; Z funkcją rozstrajania; Magnetyczny; Klucz wielofunkcyjny (multitool); Z grzechotką; Korbowy (spinner); Standardowy (L-kształtny); Z uchwytem typu T; Motylkowy; Inny
pt-PT: Tipo de design da chave de tambor: Chave dobrável; Chave com afrouxador; Chave magnética; Chave multiferramenta; Com roquete; Chave rápida (giratória); Padrão (formato em L); Pega em T; Chave de borboleta; Outro
lt-LT: Būgno rakto dizaino tipas: Sulankstomas raktas; Raktas su atleidimo mechanizmu; Magnetinis raktas; Daugiafunkcio įrankio raktas; Reketinis; Greitasis raktas (sukiklis); Standartinis (L formos); T formos rankena; Sparnuotasis raktas; Kita
sv: Typ av trumnyckeldesign: Hopfällbar nyckel; Nyckel med detuner; Magnetisk nyckel; Multiverktygsnyckel; Spärrnyckel; Snabbnyckel (snurra); Standard (L-formad); T-handtag; Vingnyckel; Övrigt
nl: Ontwerptype stemsleutel: Inklapbare sleutel; Sleutel met ontstemmer; Magnetische sleutel; Multitoolsleutel; Ratelsleutel; Snelsleutel (spinner); Standaard (L-vormig); T-handgreep; Vleugelsleutel; Anders
cs: Typ konstrukce klíče na buben: Skládací klíč; Klíč s odlaďovačem; Magnetický klíč; Multifunkční klíč; Ráčnový; Rychloklíč (klička); Standardní (ve tvaru L); S rukojetí ve tvaru T; Křídlový klíč; Ostatní
ro-RO: Tipul de design al cheii de tobă: Cheie pliabilă; Cheie cu funcție de slăbire; Cheie magnetică; Cheie multifuncțională; Cu clichet; Cheie rapidă (manivelă rotativă); Standard (în formă de L); Mâner în formă de T; Cheie fluture; Altele
zh-CN: 鼓钥匙设计类型: 折叠式; 带降音功能; 磁吸鼓钥匙; 多功能鼓钥匙; 棘轮; 速调鼓钥匙（旋转器）; 标准（L 型）; T 型手柄; 翼型鼓钥匙; 其他
vi: Kiểu thiết kế của khóa chỉnh trống: Khóa gập; Khóa kèm công cụ xả; Khóa từ tính; Khóa đa năng; Bánh cóc; Khóa tốc độ (có tay quay); Tiêu chuẩn (chữ L); Cán chữ T; Khóa tai hồng; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta zasnove ključa za uglaševanje bobnov: Zložljiv ključ; Ključ z odvijalnikom; Magnetni ključ; Večnamenski ključ; Ključ z ragljo; Hitri ključ (vrtljivi); Standardni (oblika L); T-ročaj; Krilati ključ; Drugo
nb: Designtype for trommenøkkel: Sammenleggbar nøkkel; Nøkkel med avstemmer; Magnetisk nøkkel; Flerverktøynøkkel; Skrallenøkkel; Hurtignøkkel (sveiv); Standard (L-form); T-håndtak; Vingenøkkel; Annet
tr: Davul akort anahtarı tasarım tipi: Katlanabilir anahtar; Gevşetmeli anahtar; Manyetik anahtar; Çok amaçlı anahtar; Cırcırlı; Hızlı anahtar (çark); Standart (L tipi); T saplı; Kelebek anahtar; Diğer
es: Tipo de diseño de llaves de afinación para tambor: Llave plegable; Llave destensadora; Llave magnética; Llave multiherramienta; De trinquete; Llave rápida (giratoria); Estándar (en forma de L); Mango en T; Llave de mariposa; Otro
it: Tipo di design della chiave per tamburo: Chiave pieghevole; Chiave con detuner; Chiave magnetica; Chiave multiutensile; A cricchetto; Chiave rapida (a manovella); Standard (a L); Impugnatura a T; Chiave a farfalla; Altro